Alaska, session 34, HB234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 18.08.200(7) is amended to read: 06 (7) "emergency medical dispatcher" means an initial first responder 07 [A] trained as a public safety telecommunicator with additional training and specific 08 emergency medical knowledge essential for the efficient management of emergency 09 medical communications; 10 * Sec. 2. AS 39.35.680(30) is amended to read: 11 (30) "peace officer" or "firefighter" means an employee occupying a 12 position as a peace officer, chief of police, regional public safety officer, correctional 13 officer, correctional superintendent, firefighter, fire chief, dispatcher in a police or 14 fire department or in a state trooper office, or probation officer, but does not 01 include a village public safety officer or dispatcher employed by a village public 02 safety officer program established under AS 18.65.670; 03 * Sec. 3. AS 39.35.990(20) is amended to read: 04 (20) "peace officer" or "firefighter" means an employee occupying a 05 position as a peace officer, chief of police, regional public safety officer, correctional 06 officer, correctional superintendent, firefighter, fire chief, dispatcher in a police or 07 fire department or in a state trooper office, or probation officer, but does not 08 include a village public safety officer or dispatcher employed by a village public 09 safety officer program established under AS 18.65.670; 10 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.